New York, session 2025-2026, S5203.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1117 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) Any authorized insurer which issues contracts in connection with 4 plans providing benefits for long term care pursuant to the provisions 5 of this section shall prepare and maintain records which list the number 6 of such policies cancelled during each year. Such records shall also 7 indicate which policies were cancelled due to, or within thirty days 8 after, an increase in policy premiums. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06019-01-5